Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 36.16.110 and 2010 c 207 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The county legislative authority in each county shall, at its next regular or special meeting after being appraised of any vacancy in any county, township, precinct, or road district office of the county, fill the vacancy by the appointment of some person qualified to hold such office, and the officers thus appointed shall hold office until the next general election, and until their successors are elected and qualified.(2) If a vacancy occurs in a partisan county office after the general election in a year that the position appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term, the term of the successor ((who is of the same party as the incumbent)) may commence once he or she has qualified as defined in RCW 29A.04.133 and shall continue through the term for which he or she was elected. If the incumbent declared a political party preference at the time they were elected to the partisan county office, the successor appointed pursuant to this section must be from the same political party as the incumbent.(3) If a vacancy occurs in a nonpartisan county board of commissioners elective office or nonpartisan county council elective office, the person appointed to fill the vacancy must be from the same legislative district, county, or county commissioner or council district as the county elective officer whose office was vacated, and must be one of three persons who must be nominated by the nonpartisan executive or nonpartisan chair of the board of commissioners for the county. In case a majority of the members of the county legislative authority do not agree upon the appointment within sixty days after the vacancy occurs, the governor shall within thirty days thereafter, and from the list of nominees provided for in this section, appoint someone to fill the vacancy.(4) If a vacancy occurs in a nonpartisan county board of commissioners elective office or nonpartisan county council elective office after the general election in a year that the position appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term, the term of the successor may commence once he or she has qualified as defined in RCW 29A.04.133 and shall continue through the term for which he or she was elected.Sec. 2. RCW 42.12.040 and 2013 c 11 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If a vacancy occurs in any partisan elective office in the executive or legislative branches of state government or in any partisan county elective office before the first day of the regular filing period, the position must be open for filing during the regular filing period as provided in RCW 29A.24.171 and a successor shall be elected at the general election. Except during the last year of the term of office, if such a vacancy occurs on or after the first day of the regular filing period, the election of the successor shall occur at the next succeeding general election as provided in RCW 29A.24.171. The elected successor shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term. This section shall not apply to any vacancy occurring in a charter county which has charter provisions inconsistent with this section.(2) If a vacancy occurs in any legislative office or in any partisan county office after the general election in a year that the position appears on the ballot and before the start of the next term, the term of the successor ((who is of the same party as the incumbent)) may commence once he or she has qualified as defined in RCW 29A.04.133 and shall continue through the term for which he or she was elected. If the incumbent declared a political party preference at the time they were elected to the legislative office or partisan county office, the successor appointed pursuant to this section must be from the same political party as the incumbent.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, if the proposed amendment to Article II, section 15 of the state Constitution, HJR . . . (H-2541), is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 2026. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.--- END ---